Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.530

Limitations on liability for equine activities—Definitions.

Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions in this section apply to RCW 4.24.530, 4.24.540, and section 3, chapter 292, Laws of 1989.

(1) "Equine" means a horse, pony, mule, donkey, or hinny.

(2) "Equine activity" means: (a) Equine shows, fairs, competitions, performances, or parades that involve any or all breeds of equines and any of the equine disciplines, including, but not limited to, dressage, hunter and jumper horse shows, grand prix jumping, three-day events, combined training, rodeos, driving, pulling, cutting, polo, steeplechasing, endurance trail riding and western games, and hunting; (b) equine training and/or teaching activities; (c) boarding equines; (d) riding, inspecting, or evaluating an equine belonging to another whether or not the owner has received some monetary consideration or other thing of value for the use of the equine or is permitting a prospective purchaser of the equine to ride, inspect, or evaluate the equine; and (e) rides, trips, hunts, or other equine activities of any type however informal or impromptu that are sponsored by an equine activity sponsor.

(3) "Equine activity sponsor" means an individual, group or club, partnership, or corporation, whether or not the sponsor is operating for profit or nonprofit, which sponsors, organizes, or provides the facilities for, an equine activity including but not limited to: Pony clubs, 4-H clubs, hunt clubs, riding clubs, school and college sponsored classes and programs, therapeutic riding programs, and, operators, instructors, and promoters of equine facilities, including but not limited to stables, clubhouses, ponyride strings, fairs, and arenas at which the activity is held.

(4) "Participant" means any person, whether amateur or professional, who directly engages in an equine activity, whether or not a fee is paid to participate in the equine activity.

(5) "Engages in an equine activity" means a person who rides, trains, drives, or is a passenger upon an equine, whether mounted or unmounted, and does not mean a spectator at an equine activity or a person who participates in the equine activity but does not ride, train, drive, or ride as a passenger upon an equine.

(6) "Equine professional" means a person engaged for compensation (a) in instructing a participant or renting to a participant an equine for the purpose of riding, driving, or being a passenger upon the equine, or, (b) in renting equipment or tack to a participant.

[ 1989 c 292 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—1989 c 292 ss 1 and 2: "Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply only to causes of action filed on or after July 23, 1989." [ 1989 c 292 s 3.]